Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 4 Fees and Taxes

Cross references. —

As to tax on surplus lines, see §

26-11-118

.

As to fees and taxes of farm mutual property insurers generally, see §

26-26-109

.

For license fee of fraternal benefit societies, see §

26-29-227

.

As to exemption of fraternal benefit societies from taxation, see §

26-29-224

.

As to exemption of the Wyoming Insurance Guaranty Association from payment of fees and taxes, see §

26-31-114

.

§ 26-4-101.
Fee schedule. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The commissioner shall collect in advance or contemporaneously fees, licenses and miscellaneous charges as specified in this subsection. Collection may include the acceptance of electronic funds transfer. All fees and other charges collected by the commissioner as specified in this subsection shall be nonrefundable:

Certificate of authority:

For filing application for insurer’s initial certificate of authority, excluding multiple employer welfare arrangements, including all documents submitted as a part of the application, examination of application and issuance of certificate of authority, if issued . . . . . $750.00

Annual continuation, excluding multiple employer welfare arrangements, including filing of annual statement . . . . . $500.00

Reinstatement (W.S. 26-3-114(c)) . . . . . $ 50.00

Certified copy . . . . . $ 15.00

Registration of additional title (W.S.

26-3-120

) . . . . . $ 25.00

Annual renewal
. . . . .
$ 25.00

Charter documents (other than those filed with application for certificate of authority). Filing amendments to articles of incorporation, charter, bylaws, power of attorney (as to reciprocal insurers) and other constituent documents
of the insurer, each document . . . . . $ 10.00

Annual statement. For filing annual statement other than included with (a)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection . . . . . $ 25.00

Service of process, acceptance . . . . . $ 10.00

Insurance producers or title agents:

Property, casualty, personal lines or title:

Application for original resident license and issuance of license, if issued . . . . . $100.00

Appointment, each producer or agent, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Annual continuation of appointment, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Temporary license, application fee, and issuance, if issued . . . . . $ 10.00

License under waiver of residency requirement pursuant to a reciprocal agreement, application fee and issuance . . . . . $ 150.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . .
$100.00

Nonresident
. . . . .
$150.00

Statement of termination of appointment, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Life, accident and health or sickness or disability, variable life and variable annuities or credit:

Application for original resident license and issuance of license, if issued . . . . . $100.00

Appointment, each producer or agent, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Annual continuation of appointment, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Temporary license, application fee, and issuance, if issued . . . . . $ 10.00

License under waiver of residency requirement pursuant to a reciprocal agreement, application fee and issuance . . . . . $ 150.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . .
$100.00

Nonresident
. . . . .
$150.00

Statement of termination of appointment, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 7, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 5.

Surplus line brokers:

Application for original license, and issuance of license, if issued
. . . . . $100.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . . $100.00

Nonresident
. . . . . $150.00

Adjusters:

Application for original license, and issuance of license, if issued
. . . . . $100.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . . $100.00

Nonresident
. . . . . $150.00

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 7, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 3.

Insurance consultant for hire:

Application for original license, and issuance, if issued
. . . . . $100.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . . $100.00

Nonresident
. . . . . $150.00

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 97, § 2.

Limited lines producers:

Application for original individual license and issuance of license, if issued
. . . . . $20.00

Continuation of individual license
. . . . . $20.00

Application for original business entity license and issuance of license, if issued
. . . . . $100.00

Continuation
of business entity license
. . . . . $100.00

Rating organization license or triennial renewal thereof, including all kinds of insurance as to which licensed . . . . . $150.00

Certification of any document and affixing seal of office thereto . . . . . $15.00

Copies of documents on file in the department, a reasonable uniform charge per page as fixed by the commissioner;

Pharmacy benefit manager (annually) . . . . . $500.00

Third party administrator (biennial) . . . . . $200.00

Multiple employer welfare arrangement, annual license or renewal . . . . . $500.00.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 97, § 2.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 231, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 26-40; Laws 1963, ch. 172, § 1; 1967, ch. 136, § 78; 1975, ch. 158, § 1; 1977, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 182, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-84; Laws 1978, ch. 2, § 1; 1979, ch. 9, § 1; ch. 120, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1986, ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 17, § 2; ch. 36, § 1; ch. 170, § 1; 1993, ch. 97, § 2; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 30, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, §§ 2, 5; 2004, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 60, §§ 2, 3; 2013 ch. 123, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 90, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added the final sentence to the introductory language of (a); deleted “and including disability insurance without additional license or fee when written by property, casualty or surety insurer otherwise represented by the agent” from the end of the introductory paragraph (a)(v)(A); repealed former (a)(vi), pertaining to broker fees; repealed former (a)(x), pertaining to an insurance vending machine license; substituted “Continuation of license” for “Annual continuation of license” throughout the section; increased fees and charges in (a)(v), (viii), (ix), (xi), (xii), and (xiv); and, in (xii), deleted “(nonreturnable)” following “Application for original license.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote (a)(v)(B); added “Resident,” “Nonresident,” and “$150.00” in (a)(viii) and (a)(ix); repealed former (a)(xi), which read: “Service representative: Application for original license, and issuance, if issued ..................... $ 100.00 Continuation of license ..................... $ 100.00”; rewrote (a)(xii), and made related changes.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013,
substituted the colon for “pursuant to W.S. 26-9-209(c):”;
added “individual” following “Application for
original”; and added the last sentence in (a)(xiv).

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (a)(xviii).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added (a)(xix).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2019,
in (a)(v), added "Insurance producers or title a"; in (a)(v)(A) substituted "personal lines or" for "surety and", added a colon after "title" and deleted "insurance agents:"; in (a)(v)(A)(I) deleted "agents"; in (a)(v)(A)(II) added comma after "Appointment", deleted "of" and added "each producer or"; in (a)(v)(B) added colon after "credit" and deleted "insurance:"; in (a)(v)(B)(I) deleted "agents"; in (a)(v)(B)(II) added a comma after "Appointment", deleted "of" and added "each producer or"; in (a)(xiv) substituted "lines producers" for "license" and added "individual" after "of" and "Continuation of business entity license $100".

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(i)(A) and (B), added "excluding multiple employer welfare arrangements," and added (a)(xx).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

effective January 1, 2023, in (a)(viii), (a)(ix), and (a)(xii), added “resident” following “original,” added “License under waiver of residency requirement pursuant to a reciprocal agreement, application fee and issuance…$150.00”; and added (a)(xxi).

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 7, § 3, directs the insurance commissioner to implement the biannual licensing provided in the act beginning with licenses issued or subject to renewal in the 2005 calendar year. Specifically, license fees provided under W.S.

26-4-101

,

26-46-102

and

26-47-113

prior to the amendment of those provisions by the act will apply to licenses issued or renewed through December 31, 2004. On and after January 1, 2005, license fees under W.S.

26-4-101

,

26-46-102

and

26-47-113

as amended by the act, will be applicable. If this implementation shortens the period for which the license fee or continuation fee has been paid, no refund of the unearned fee shall be made. If this implementation lengthens the period for which the license fee or continuation fee has been paid, no additional fee shall be charged.

Laws 2019, ch. 99 § 3, provides: "This act applies to health insurance policies issued on or after July 1, 2019."

Stated

in

State Sur. Co. v. Lamb Constr. Co., 625 P.2d 184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1981).

Cited

in

Wyoming Ins. Guar. Ass'n v. Allstate Indem. Co., 844 P.2d 464,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 26-4-101.
Fee schedule. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The commissioner shall collect in advance or contemporaneously fees, licenses and miscellaneous charges as specified in this subsection. Collection may include the acceptance of electronic funds transfer. All fees and other charges collected by the commissioner as specified in this subsection shall be nonrefundable:

Certificate of authority:

For filing application for insurer’s initial certificate of authority, excluding multiple employer welfare arrangements, including all documents submitted as a part of the application, examination of application and issuance of certificate of authority, if issued . . . . . $750.00

Annual continuation, excluding multiple employer welfare arrangements, including filing of annual statement . . . . . $500.00

Reinstatement (W.S. 26-3-114(c)) . . . . . $ 50.00

Certified copy . . . . . $ 15.00

Registration of additional title (W.S.

26-3-120

) . . . . . $ 25.00

Annual renewal
. . . . .
$ 25.00

Charter documents (other than those filed with application for certificate of authority). Filing amendments to articles of incorporation, charter, bylaws, power of attorney (as to reciprocal insurers) and other constituent documents
of the insurer, each document . . . . . $ 10.00

Annual statement. For filing annual statement other than included with (a)(i)(A) or (B) of this subsection . . . . . $ 25.00

Service of process, acceptance . . . . . $ 10.00

Insurance producers or title agents:

Property, casualty, personal lines or title:

Application for original resident license and issuance of license, if issued . . . . . $100.00

Appointment, each producer or agent, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Annual continuation of appointment, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Temporary license, application fee, and issuance, if issued . . . . . $ 10.00

License under waiver of residency requirement pursuant to a reciprocal agreement, application fee and issuance . . . . . $ 150.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . .
$100.00

Nonresident
. . . . .
$150.00

Statement of termination of appointment, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Life, accident and health or sickness or disability, variable life and variable annuities or credit:

Application for original resident license and issuance of license, if issued . . . . . $100.00

Appointment, each producer or agent, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Annual continuation of appointment, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Temporary license, application fee, and issuance, if issued . . . . . $ 10.00

License under waiver of residency requirement pursuant to a reciprocal agreement, application fee and issuance . . . . . $ 150.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . .
$100.00

Nonresident
. . . . .
$150.00

Statement of termination of appointment, each insurer . . . . . $ 15.00

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 7, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 201, § 5.

Surplus line brokers:

Application for original resident license, and issuance of license, if issued
. . . . . $100.00

License under waiver of residency requirement pursuant to a reciprocal agreement, application fee and issuance . . . . . $150.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . . $100.00

Nonresident
. . . . . $150.00

Adjusters:

Application for original resident license, and issuance of license, if issued
. . . . . $100.00

License under waiver of residency requirement pursuant to a reciprocal agreement, application fee and issuance . . . . . $150.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . . $100.00

Nonresident
. . . . . $150.00

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 7, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 60, § 3.

Insurance consultant for hire:

Application for original resident license, and issuance, if issued
. . . . . $100.00

License under waiver of residency requirement pursuant to a reciprocal agreement, application fee and issuance . . . . . $150.00

Continuation of license:

Resident
. . . . . $100.00

Nonresident
. . . . . $150.00

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 97, § 2.

Limited lines producers:

Application for original individual license and issuance of license, if issued
. . . . . $20.00

Continuation of individual license
. . . . . $20.00

Application for original business entity license and issuance of license, if issued
. . . . . $100.00

Continuation of business entity license
. . . . . $100.00

Rating organization license or triennial renewal thereof, including all kinds of insurance as to which licensed . . . . . $150.00

Certification of any document and affixing seal of office thereto . . . . . $15.00

Copies of documents on file in the department, a reasonable uniform charge per page as fixed by the commissioner;

Pharmacy benefit manager (annually) . . . . . $500.00

Third party administrator (biennial) . . . . . $200.00

Multiple employer welfare arrangement, annual license or renewal . . . . . $500.00

Continuing education:

Application for approval of continuing education provider . . . . . $100.00

Continuation of continuing education provider approval . . . . . $100.00

Application for course approval . . . . . $50.00

Continuation of course approval . . . . . $50.00.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 97, § 2.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 231, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 26-40; Laws 1963, ch. 172, § 1; 1967, ch. 136, § 78; 1975, ch. 158, § 1; 1977, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 182, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-84; Laws 1978, ch. 2, § 1; 1979, ch. 9, § 1; ch. 120, § 2; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1986, ch. 22, § 1; 1987, ch. 17, § 2; ch. 36, § 1; ch. 170, § 1; 1993, ch. 97, § 2; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 30, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, §§ 2, 5; 2004, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 60, §§ 2, 3; 2013 ch. 123, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2016 ch. 90, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 19, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 99, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 46, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

§ 26-4-102.
Record of receipts; payment to treasurer; credit to fund.

The commissioner shall keep a complete and accurate record of all monies he receives and disburses. All tax returns and records are open to examination at any time by the director of the state department of audit or his representative.

The commissioner shall promptly deposit all monies he receives from any charges to the general fund, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer, except that:

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 9, § 3.

Sixty percent (60%) of the gross premium tax levied upon fire insurance premiums shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the volunteer firefighter, EMT and search and rescue pension account pursuant to W.S.

35-9-628

and forty percent (40%) of the gross premium tax levied upon fire insurance premiums shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the Fire A legislative reserve account created by W.S. 15-5-202(e). For purposes of this paragraph, the gross premium tax levied upon fire insurance premiums is equal to thirty percent (30%) of the total gross premium tax levied upon all property, casualty and multiple line insurers;

Any premium assessments collected under W.S. 26-4-103(n), which shall be transferred to the air ambulance coverage account not more than thirty (30) days after receipt.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 75, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 233; R.S. 1931, § 57-107; C.S. 1945, § 52-107; Laws 1957, ch. 236, § 5; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-5, 26.1-79; Laws 1963, ch. 108, § 4; 1967, ch. 136, § 79; 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1987, ch. 36, § 1; 1989, ch. 80, § 1; 1991, ch. 73, § 1; ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 189, § 1; 1997, ch. 69, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015 ch. 32, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 9, § 3, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 189, § 3, effective April 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 22, § 2, effective March 9, 2020; 2020 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 8, § 2, effective April 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to state treasurer and state funds, see §§

9-1-409

through

9-1-413

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b)(i), deleted “and (xiii)” following “26-4-101(a)(v)(A)(I) and (B)(I).”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (b), substituted “deposit” for “pay,” deleted “state treasurer for credit to the” preceding “general fund,” and inserted “with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer.”

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 32, § 2, effective July 1, 2015, in (b)(ii), substituted “An amount not to exceed seventy percent (70%)” for “Fifty percent (50%),” “firefighter and EMT” for “firemen’s,” and “W.S.

35-9-628

” for “W.S.

35-9-604

” in the first sentence, and substituted “thirty percent (30%)” for “twenty-six percent (26%)” in the last sentence.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (b)(i), which read: “Fees received pursuant to W.S. 26-4-101(a)(v)(A)(I) and (B)(I) shall be paid and credited as provided in W.S.

26-10-107

; and.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (b)(ii), substituted “eighty percent (80%)” for “seventy percent (70%),” and substituted “volunteer firefighter, EMT and search and rescue pension account” for “volunteer firefighter and EMT pension account.”

The second amendment, by ch. 189, § 3, effective April 1, 2020, added (b)(iii).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, in (b)(iii), added “Any” at the beginning.

Laws 2020, ch. 22, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, in (b)(ii) substituted “Up to one hundred percent (100%)” for “An amount not to exceed eighty percent (80%).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 1, 2022, in the first sentence of (b)(ii), substituted “Sixty percent (60%)” for “Up to one hundred percent (100%)” and added “and forty percent (40%) of the gross premium tax levied upon fire insurance premiums shall be deposited by the state treasurer in the Fire A legislative reserve account created by W.S. 15 5 202(e).”

Applicability

Laws 2019, ch. 189 § 6, provides: "This act applies to air ambulance transport services provided on or after April 1, 2020."

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 26-4-103.
Premium taxes; generally; preemption by state.

Each authorized and formerly authorized insurer shall file with the commissioner on or before March 1 each year or within any extended period the commissioner grants not to exceed thirty (30) days, a report in a form the commissioner prescribes showing, except for wet marine and transportation insurance as defined in W.S.

26-5-107

and except as provided under subsection (k) of this section, total direct premium income including policy, membership and other fees, and all other considerations for insurance and annuity contracts, however designated, it received during the immediately preceding calendar year because of policies and contracts covering property, subjects or risks located, resident or to be performed in this state. The report shall also identify separately the premiums charged on life insurance policies with annualized premiums exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) for the immediately preceding calendar year. The total direct premium income reported shall include proper proportionate allocation of premiums or consideration as to those persons, property, subjects or risks in this state insured or covered under policies or contracts covering persons, property, subjects or risks located or resident in more than one (1) state, and shall be computed after deducting:

The amount of return premiums on cancelled policies, but not including the return of cash surrender values on life policies or annuity contracts; and

The amount returned to policyholders as current dividends.

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 22, §§ 1, 4.

At the same time the report is filed, each insurer shall pay for the privilege of transacting business in this state, a tax upon net premiums and net considerations to be computed at the following rates:

As to each insurer, the tax rate, except as to annuity considerations, shall be as follows:

through (C) Repealed by Laws 2020 ch. 136, § 2.

(D)

Except as provided in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph, for premium income received, seventy-five hundredths percent (.75%);

(E)

For premium income received, seventy-five hundredths percent (.75%) on the first one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) of a life insurance policy’s annual premium and seventy-five thousandths of one percent (.075%) on that portion of a life insurance policy’s annual premium exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00).

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 22, §§ 2, 4.

As to annuity considerations, the tax rate is one percent (1%).

As to wet marine and transportation insurance, on or before March 1 of each year each authorized and formerly authorized insurer shall file its report with the commissioner, on forms he prescribes and furnishes or accepts, of its gross underwriting profit on that insurance written in Wyoming during the immediately preceding calendar year, and, at the same time, shall pay a tax of three-fourths percent (3/4%) of the gross underwriting profit.

The gross underwriting profit shall be ascertained by deducting from the net premiums (i.e. gross premiums less all return premiums and premiums for reinsurance) on the wet marine and transportation insurance contracts the net losses paid (i.e. gross losses paid less salvage and recoveries on reinsurance ceded) during the calendar year under the contracts. In the case of insurers issuing participating contracts, for tax computation under this subsection, gross underwriting profit does not include the amounts refunded or paid as participating dividends by those insurers to the holders of those contracts.

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 22, § 3.

Payment of the tax required by this section is instead of all taxes imposed by the state upon premiums or upon income and of franchise, privilege or other taxes measured by the insurer’s income.

The state preempts the field of regulating, or of imposing any taxes, licenses and fees upon insurers and their general agents, agents and other representatives and on the intangible property of insurers or their representatives. All political subdivisions or agencies in the state are prohibited from regulating insurers or their general agents, agents and other representatives and from imposing or levying upon them any tax, license or fee. This provision does not prohibit the imposition by political subdivisions of taxes upon real and tangible personal property of insurers, general agents, agents and representatives.

The provisions of subsections (f) and (g) of this section shall not be modified or repealed by any law of general application enacted after December 31, 1967 unless expressly referred to or expressly repealed therein.

No tax is due or payable because of premiums or considerations received from policies or contracts issued in connection with a pension annuity or profit-sharing plan exempt or qualified under sections 401, 403, 404, 408, 457 or 501 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended or renumbered.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, any authorized insurer selling insurance shall beginning January 1, 1991 and in accordance with this subsection, pay premium taxes quarterly based upon an estimate of taxes payable on total direct premium income including policy, membership and other fees:

Each estimated quarterly tax payment shall be payable on or before the last day of the month immediately following the end of the calendar quarter for which payment is due, except payment for the calendar quarter ending December 31 of each year shall be payable on or before March 1 of the immediately succeeding calendar year and shall include any adjustments for the calendar year for which the final quarterly payment is made. Except for the calendar quarter ending December 31, the quarterly payment shall not be less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the total premium tax paid during the preceding calendar year;

Any adjustment to estimated quarterly payments for any calendar year and any claim by an insurer for a refund shall be made at the time of filing the annual report required under subsection (a) of this section. Following notice to the insurer by the commissioner, adjustment under this paragraph may be added to or deducted from subsequent quarterly payments under this subsection;

The commissioner shall suspend or revoke the certificate of authority for any insurer failing to pay premium taxes pursuant to this subsection.

The amount of tax credits for which an insurer qualifies under W.S.

9-12-1301

through

9-12-1312

shall be allowed as a credit against premium tax owed by the insurer under subsections (a) through (k) of this section.

At the same time a report under subsection (a) of this section is filed, an insurer making private health benefit plans available in this state, and any plan which has entered into agreement under W.S. 42-4-123(j), shall pay to the commissioner a three-quarter percent (.75%) assessment upon net premiums and net considerations. The commissioner shall, not more than thirty (30) days after receipt, transfer premium assessments paid under this subsection to the air ambulance coverage account. Application of this subsection shall be contingent on operation of the air ambulance transport services program under W.S. 42-4-123(b).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 80; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-80; Laws 1975, ch. 38, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1986, ch. 22, §§ 1 to 4; 1989, ch. 80, § 1; 1991, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 53, § 1; ch. 149, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2010, ch. 113, § 2; 2019 ch. 189, § 3, effective April 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 22, § 2, effective March 9, 2020; 2020 ch. 136, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

in (h), deleted “(e)” following “provisions of subsections.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

added (m).

Laws 2010, ch. 113, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2010.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 1, 2020, in (m), substituted “under subsections (a) through (k) of this section” for “under this section”; and added (n).

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 22, § 2, in (n), added the last sentence.

Laws 2020, ch. 22, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2020.

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 136, §§ 1, 2, effective January 1, 2021, in the introductory language of (a) added the second sentence; repealed (b)(i)(A) through (b)(i)(C), which read “(A) For premium income received in 1991 the tax rate shall be two and one-tenth percent (2.1%); (B) For premium income received in 1992 the tax rate shall be one and six-tenths percent (1.6%); (C) For premium income received in 1993 the tax rate shall be one and two-tenths percent (1.2%)”; in (b)(i)(D) substituted “Except as provided in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph, for premium income received” for “For premium income received in 1994 and thereafter the tax rate shall be”; and added (b)(i)(E) and made a related change.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Internal Revenue Code. —

The provisions of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954 referred to in subsection (j) are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 401, 403, 404, 408, 457 and 501, respectively.

Applicability.—

Laws 2019, ch. 189 § 6, provides: "This act applies to air ambulance transport services provided on or after April 1, 2020."

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Tax on premiums received by out-of-state insurer constitutional. —

Where an out-of-state insurer receives the benefits of the state's protection of its insureds, a tax imposed on the gross Wyoming premium receipts of the insurer is constitutionally fair. Armed Forces Coop. Insuring Ass'n v. Department of Ins., 622 P.2d 1318,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1980), overruled in part, Torres v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2004 WY 92, 95 P.3d 794,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2004).

Liability for past premium taxes of another company. —

Where a foreign order declares that defendant is liable for the past, present and future obligations of another company, defendant's liability for past premium taxes owed by that company is a question of fact that is properly before the district court. Wyoming Ins. Dep't v. Sierra Life Ins. Co., 599 P.2d 1360,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 453

(Wyo. 1979).

Improper to grant injunctive relief requested by commissioner until parties' obligations ascertained. —

It would be improper to grant certain injunctive relief requested by the insurance commissioner, i.e., the direct payment of the tax debt of an unknown amount for certain years, the direct report of the proportion of the premiums collected on persons, subjects or risks located or resident in Wyoming and covered by policies in which such risks are in more than one state, and the payment of fines as civil penalties, where the obligation for the payment of such taxes has not been ascertained and the companies involved have not been requested to make the designated reports or pay the taxes. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

And commissioner cannot ask for judicial advice where official administrative action not taken. —

The insurance commissioner cannot ask the court to advise him relative to which of two actions he should take in connection with the required allocation of premiums on policies covering multi-state risks where he has not taken official administrative action on the issue one way or the other. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction, application, and operation of state “retaliatory” statutes imposing special taxes or fees on foreign insurers doing business within the state, 30 ALR4th 873.

§ 26-4-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 149, §§ 2(a) and (b).

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 81, related to a credit an insurer could reverse against tax liability by investing its assets in Wyoming investments.

§ 26-4-105.
Premium taxes; commissioner to collect tax; failure to pay.

The taxes imposed under W.S.

26-4-103

shall be collected by the commissioner.

If the insurer does not pay the tax on or before March 31 of the year in which due, the tax is delinquent, and the commissioner may enforce payment thereof by the seizure, distraint and sale of any of the insurer’s property within Wyoming or by any other lawful means. If the tax is delinquent, the commissioner shall suspend or revoke the insurer’s certificate of authority.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 82; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-82; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “and

26-4-104

” following “W.S.

26-4-103

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Improper to grant injunctive relief requested by commissioneruntil parties' obligations ascertained. —

It would be improper to grant certain injunctive relief requested by the insurance commissioner, i.e., the direct payment of the tax debt of an unknown amount for certain years, the direct report of the proportion of the premiums collected on persons, subjects or risks located or resident in Wyoming and covered by policies in which such risks are in more than one state, and the payment of fines as civil penalties, where the obligation for the payment of such taxes has not been ascertained and the companies involved have not been requested to make the designated reports or pay the taxes. Langdon v. Aetna Life Ins. Co., 640 P.2d 1092,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 299

(Wyo. 1982).